apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="робітни/к__n">
  <e>       <p><l>к</l>         <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ка</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кові</l>      <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ку</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ка</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ком</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кові</l>      <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ку</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>че</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ків</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ків</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l>      <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ця</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>цю</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>цею</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>це</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ць</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>цям</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ць</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>цями</l>      <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>цях</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="песик__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>у</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>у</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="зву/к__n">
  <e>       <p><l>к</l>         <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>кові</l>      <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>к</l>         <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ком</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ків</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l>      <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l>       <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="робітник">        <i>робітни</i><par n="робітни/к__n"/></e>
<e lm="звук">            <i>зву</i><par n="зву/к__n"/></e>
<e lm="песик">           <i>песик</i><par n="песик__n"/></e>
